Washington statutes.
RCW 7.24.140

General purpose stated.

This chapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it, and to harmonize, as far as possible, with federal laws and regulations on the subject of declaratory judgments and decrees.

[ 1935 c 113 s 15; RRS s 784-15.]